Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-129
Aircraft; license, certificate, or permit required.

Except as provided in section 3-130, it shall be unlawful for any person to operate or cause or authorize to be operated any civil aircraft within this state unless such aircraft has an appropriate effective license, certificate, or permit issued by the United States Government.

Laws 1945, c. 5, § 9(2), p. 91;

Laws 1973, LB 341, § 2;

Laws 2002, LB 446, § 1.